District of Columbia statutes.
29-1201.01

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act of 2010”.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 101 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.